Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2030
Counties and municipalities; certification of facility and system capacity; filing required; department; approval; restrict access to facilities and systems; when.

On or before October 1, 1993, a certification shall be filed with the department on behalf of each county and municipality with respect to (1) facility and system capacity for solid waste management for the solid waste generated within each solid waste jurisdiction area and (2) facility and system capacity for solid waste generated outside of each solid waste jurisdiction area and disposed of in facilities within each solid waste jurisdiction area. If a county or municipality is unable to certify capacity for waste generated outside its solid waste jurisdiction area, it may restrict access to its facilities and systems for such solid waste. Such certification shall be approved by the department if it is found to be in compliance with the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act and the rules and regulations adopted under the act.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 30.